Massachusetts, session 194th, S2055.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2002 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- (__) Sales of boats built or rebuilt and 
delivered in Massachusetts by Massachusetts craftsmen.